Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.013

Donations, gifts, conveyances, devises, and grants.

The Washington state patrol may accept any and all donations, bequests, gifts, conveyances, devices [devises], and grants conditional or otherwise; or money, property, service, or other things of value which may be received from the United States or any agency thereof, any governmental agency, institution, person, firm, or corporation, public and private, to be held, used, or applied for the purpose of fulfilling its mission.

[ 2009 c 108 s 1.]